Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Secretary of State may  apply to the federal government for grant
moneys to fund a pilot project for the  purpose of providing a live video feed that may be
publicly accessed over the Internet of:
(a) Rooms in which ballots are tallied; and
(b) Official ballot drop sites.
(2) The secretary may adopt rules that establish the requirements for the location and
operation of any video cameras installed or operated under this section. The rules  shall en-
sure that a video camera is not installed or operated in a manner that would:
(a) Violate an election security plan adopted under ORS 254.074; or
(b) Identify the manner in which any individual elector cast the elector’s ballot for or
against any candidate or ballot measure.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on July 1, 2026.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1094 (SB 1094-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1094 (SB 1094-INTRO) Page 2